Hawaii statutes.
§490:3-506.5 Charges for dishonored checks.
The payee or a holder in due course of any check, draft, or order for the
payment of money that has been dishonored for lack of funds or credit to pay
the check, draft, or order or because the maker has no account with the drawee
shall be allowed to assess the maker a service charge of not more than $30. [L
1999, c 48, §1; am L 2006, c 206, §1; am L 2010, c 39, §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next